Tennessee, session 114, HB1553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-51-303(a), is amended by
deleting subdivision (21) and substituting:
(21) Articles of termination of corporation existence………………………... No fee
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-101-506(h), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(h) Any person that ceases solicitation activities after registration must, within
ninety (90) days after solicitation activities end, notify the secretary of state of the
ceasing of solicitation activities and file with the secretary of state financial
documentation required under subdivision (b)(1).
SECTION 3. This act takes effect on July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1553
010260
- 1 -